Oklahoma, session 2026, SB235.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 698.4 of Title 70, unless there
is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:

A. As used in this section, “eligible school district” means a
public school district or public school district foundation in this
state that has established a program to provide tuition or loan
repayment assistance to school district employees who pursue an
undergraduate degree from a teacher preparation program accredited
by the Commission for Educational Quality and Accountability leading
to a standard teaching certificate.
B. There is hereby created the Grow Your Own Educator Program
to provide matching fund grants to eligible school districts. The
program shall be established and maintained by the State Department
of Education.
C. An eligible school district seeking to participate in the
Grow Your Own Educator Program shall submit an application in the
manner and on a form prescribed by the State Department of
Education. The application shall include:
1. The amount of matching fund grants requested;
2. The position of the employee pursuing an undergraduate
degree from a teacher preparation program; and
3. The subject area in which the employee is pursuing an
undergraduate degree from a teacher preparation program.
D. Matching fund grants shall be awarded on a first-come,
first-served basis. Grants shall be provided without any limitation
other than the amount of funds available in the Grow Your Own
Educator Revolving Fund created pursuant to Section 2 of this act
and the number of eligible school districts that apply.
E. By June 30, 2026, and each June 30 thereafter, an eligible
school district that receives a matching fund grant pursuant to this
section shall electronically submit a report to the State Department
of Education that includes:
1. A status update on the progress the employee receiving
tuition assistance is making in the teacher preparation program in
which he or she is enrolled; or
ENR. S. B. NO. 235 Page 2

2. The employment status of the employee receiving loan
repayment assistance.
F. By December 31, 2026, and each December 31 thereafter, the
State Department of Education shall electronically submit a report
to the Governor, the President Pro Tempore of the Senate, and the
Speaker of the House of Representatives that includes:
1. The school district matching fund grant recipients;
2. The amount of matching fund grants allocated to each
recipient;
3. The subject area in which the employee receiving tuition
assistance is pursuing an undergraduate degree, or the subject area
in which the employee receiving loan repayment assistance has
received an undergraduate degree; and
4. The information submitted pursuant to subsection E of this
section.
G. The State Board of Education shall promulgate rules to
implement the provisions of this section.
SECTION 2. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 698.5 of Title 70, unless there
is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
There is hereby created in the State Treasury a revolving fund
for the State Board of Education to be designated the “Grow Your Own
Educator Revolving Fund”. The fund shall be a continuing fund, not
subject to fiscal year limitations, and shall consist of all monies
received by the State Board of Education from legislative
appropriations provided for the purpose of implementing the Grow
Your Own Educator Program created in Section 1 of this act. All
monies accruing to the credit of the fund are hereby appropriated
and may be budgeted and expended by the Board for the purpose
provided for in this section. Expenditures from the fund shall be
made upon warrants issued by the State Treasurer against claims
filed as prescribed by law with the Director of the Office of
Management and Enterprise Services for approval and payment.
ENR. S. B. NO. 235 Page 3

SECTION 3. This act shall become effective July 1, 2025.
SECTION 4. It being immediately necessary for the preservation
of the public peace, health, or safety, an emergency is hereby
declared to exist, by reason whereof this act shall take effect and
be in full force from and after its passage and approval.
ENR. S. B. NO. 235 Page 4

Passed the Senate the 28th day of May, 2025.
Presiding Officer of the Senate
Passed the House of Representatives the 28th day of May, 2025.
Presiding Officer of the House
of Representatives
OFFICE OF THE GOVERNOR
Received by the Office of the Governor this ____________________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
By: _________________________________
Approved by the Governor of the State of Oklahoma this _________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
_________________________________
Governor of the State of Oklahoma
OFFICE OF THE SECRETARY OF STATE
Received by the Office of the Secretary of State this __________
day of __________________, 20 _______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
By: _________________________________
ENR. S. B. NO. 235 Page 5